Utah statutes.
41-22-5.1.   Rules of board relating to display of registration stickers.
In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act,
the board shall make rules for the display of a registration sticker on an
off-highway vehicle in accordance with Section 41-22-3.
